Montana, session 2025, HB581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-6-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-6-303. Officers of court -- definitions. (1) The chief of police of the city is the executive officer of
the municipal court. The chief of police shall serve all process and execute all orders of the court, either in
person or by subordinate police officer, who shall execute process in the chief's name.
(2) The chief of police, with the approval of the judge, shall appoint one or more police officers, or
reserve officers, as defined in 7-32-201 or full-time or part-time special service officers authorized to carry a
firearm and acting under the supervision of the city police, as court officers, one of whom shall attend the
sessions of the court and perform all duties in connection with the court that the judge may require. IF A COURT
REMANDS A DEFENDANT INTO CUSTODY, A COURT OFFICER HAS AUTHORITY TO TRANSPORT THE DEFENDANT TO THE
PLACE OF DETENTION.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "reserve officers" and "special service officers" have the same
meanings as provided in 7-32-201."

Section 2. Section 7-32-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-32-201. Definitions. As used in this part, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Auxiliary officer" means an unsworn, part-time, volunteer member of a law enforcement
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 581

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0581.2
agency who may perform but is not limited to the performance of such functions as civil defense, search and
rescue, office duties, crowd and traffic control, and crime prevention activities.
(2) "Council" means the Montana public safety officer standards and training council established in
2-15-2029.
(3) "General law enforcement duties" means patrol operations performed for detection, prevention,
and suppression of crime and the enforcement of criminal and traffic codes of this state and its local
governments.
(4) "Law enforcement agency" means a law enforcement service provided directly by a local
government.
(5) "Law enforcement officer" means a sworn, full-time, employed member of a law enforcement
agency who is a peace officer, as defined in 46-1-202, and has arrest authority, as described in 46-6-210.
(6) "Reserve officer" means a sworn, part-time, volunteer member of a law enforcement agency or
a part-time, paid member of a law enforcement agency serving as a court officer as provided in 3-6-303. The
volunteer member or the part-time paid member is a peace officer, as defined in 46-1-202, and has arrest
authority, as described in 46-6-210, only when authorized to perform these functions as a representative of the
law enforcement agency.
(7) "Special services officer" means an unsworn, full-time or part-time, volunteer or paid member of
a law enforcement agency who may perform functions, other than general law enforcement duties, that require
specialized skills, training, and qualifications, who may be required to train with a firearm, and who may carry a
firearm while on assigned duty as provided in 7-32-239."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 581